California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
The department shall submit to the Legislature in January and May of each year a report on the status of the Unemployment Fund and the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund. Each report shall include both actual and forecasted information on the fund balances, receipts, disbursements, claim data, tax rates, and employment levels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 39, Sec. 30.   (AB 130)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reserve Accounts [1025. - 1037.]

1025.

The director shall keep separate records of the amounts paid into the fund by each employer in his or her own behalf, or chargeable to him or her as benefits; but nothing in this division shall be construed to grant any employer or his or her employees prior claims or rights to the amount contributed by him or her to the fund, either on his or her own account or on behalf of his or her employees. The amount of employer contributions, advances, or reimbursements under Article 5 (commencing with Section 801) of Chapter 3 of this part or Section 821, and all other
 amounts payable to the fund, shall be pooled and available to pay unemployment compensation benefits to any employee entitled thereto, regardless of the source of contributions or any other amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

(a) The director shall maintain a separate reserve account for each employer, and shall credit each reserve account with all the contributions paid on his or her behalf.

(b) Unemployment compensation benefits paid to an unemployed individual during any benefit year shall be charged against the reserve account of his or her employer during his or her base period. If the individual performed services in employment for more than one employer during his or her base period,
 unemployment compensation benefits paid to him or her shall be charged against the respective reserve accounts of the employers in the proportion that the total wages paid to the individual in employment for each employer bears to the total wages paid to the individual in employment for all employers during the base period.

(c) The director shall credit the interest earned by the Unemployment Fund to each positive reserve employer account in proportion to the amount the account bears to the total of all positive reserve accounts.

(d) Except as provided by Sections 803 and 821, in proportion to the amount each employer’s taxable wages bears to the total of all employers’ taxable wages, the director shall credit to each employer reserve account all of the following:

(1) Benefit overpayments collected in the four
 quarters prior to the computation date.

(2) Positive balances in reserve accounts canceled pursuant to Section 1029.

(3) Other nontax income.

(e) Except as provided by Sections 803 and 821, in the same proportion as provided in subdivision (d), the director shall charge to each employer reserve account all of the following:

(1) The increase in the total of all negative reserve account balances as computed by subtracting the total of all negative reserve account balances on July 31 of each year prior to the cancellations required by Section 1027.5 from the total of all negative reserve account balances on the prior July 31 after the cancellations required by Section 1027.5, except as provided by Section 1144.

(2) Benefit overpayments established in the four quarters prior to the computation date.

(3) Benefits not charged to employer reserve accounts pursuant to Section 1032, 1032.5, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1335, 1338, or 1380.

(4) Other items of expense and benefit charges not included in active employer reserve accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1050, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, an employer’s reserve account shall not be relieved of charges relating to a benefit overpayment if the department determines that the payment was made because the employer, or an agent of the employer, was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to requests of the department for information relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. The department shall make this determination when the employer
 or agent fails to respond timely or adequately in two instances relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. This section shall apply to benefit overpayments established on or after October 22, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 3.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.2.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1026 or any other law, for the duration of all federal unemployment benefit programs specifically created to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic, unemployment compensation benefits paid to an unemployed individual shall not be charged against the reserve account of a tax-rated employer, unless the employer or an agent of the employer was at fault as set forth in Section 1026.1. 

(b) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2021, unless the director determines that noncharging provisions are otherwise extended by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   (AB 103)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2021, by it own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.1.

On the computation date in 1966, the portion of each negative reserve balance which has not previously been charged to the balancing account shall be transferred to that account and the employer’s reserve account thereupon canceled. The computation on such date for calendar year 1967 shall be based upon the status of the employer’s account prior to such transfer and cancellation subject to the requirements of Section 982. The computation for each calendar year beginning with calendar year 1968 shall be in accordance with the requirements of Section 982 and an employer whose reserve account has been canceled under this section shall be considered as first becoming a subject
 employer on July 1, 1966.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1897.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.5.

On the computation date each year, the amount each employer’s net balance of reserve is more negative than 21 percent of the employer’s average base payroll shall be canceled from his or her reserve balance.

The amendment made to this section by Chapter 1296 of the Statutes of 1984 shall be deemed to have become operative on June 30, 1984, and the amendment shall be given retroactive effect to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   Effective July 31, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.6.

On the computation date of June 30, 1983, the amount each employer’s net balance of reserve was more negative than 12 percent of the employer’s average base payroll shall be canceled from his or her reserve balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1296, Sec. 2.   Effective September 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

The charge of unemployment compensation benefits to an employer’s account required by Section 1026 shall be made in such manner as to include as of each computation date all unemployment compensation benefit payments made on or before the computation date. In computing the charge to employers’ accounts, a fractional part of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half dollar ($0.50) or more, in which case it shall be increased to one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.

(a) Whenever an employer ceases to pay wages in employment, the reserve account of the employer, unless it has been transferred under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1051), shall be canceled on the records of the department after a period of three consecutive years has elapsed following the latest calendar quarter in which the employer paid wages in employment.

(b) Whenever a period of three consecutive years has elapsed, commencing with the effective date of an election by
 any entity to finance benefits pursuant to Section 803, any portion of the reserve account of the entity that has not been subject to use pursuant to Section 712 or 713, unless that portion has been reacquired by the entity by termination of the election under Section 803 prior to the expiration of the three-year period, shall be canceled on the records of the department. Section 982 shall apply to that entity.

(c) Upon the termination of an election by a school employer to finance benefits pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3, any favorable balance in the account of the school employer under the election shall be canceled on the records of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 854, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.

(a) An employer that is entitled under Section 1327 to receive notice of the filing of a new or additional claim may, within 10 days after mailing of the notice, submit to the department any facts within its possession disclosing whether the claimant left the employer’s employ voluntarily and without good cause or left under one of the following circumstances:

(1) The claimant was discharged from the employment for misconduct connected with their work.

(2) The claimant’s discharge or quitting from their most recent employer was the result of an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants, including alcoholic beverages.

(3) The claimant was a student employed on a temporary basis and whose employment began within, and ended with their leaving to return to school at the close of, their vacation period.

(4) The claimant left the employer’s employ to accompany their spouse or domestic partner to a place or to join their spouse at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment, and to which a transfer of the claimant by the employer is not available.

(5) The claimant left the employer’s employ to protect their family or themselves from domestic violence abuse.

(6) The claimant left the employer’s employ to take a substantially better job.

The period during which the employer may submit these facts may be extended by the director for good cause.

(b) A base period employer that is not entitled under Section 1327 to receive notice of the filing of a new or additional claim and is entitled under Section 1329 to receive notice of computation may, within 15 days after mailing of the notice of computation, submit to the department any facts within its possession disclosing whether the claimant left the employer’s employ voluntarily and without good cause or left under one of the
 following circumstances:

(1) The claimant was discharged from the employment for misconduct connected with their work.

(2) The claimant was a student employed on a temporary basis and whose employment began within, and ended with their leaving to return to school at the close of, their vacation period.

(3) The claimant left the employer’s employ to accompany their spouse or domestic partner to a place or join their spouse at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment, and to which a transfer of the claimant by the employer is not available.

(4) The claimant left the employer’s employ to protect their family or themselves from domestic violence abuse.

(5) The claimant left the employer’s employ to take a substantially better job.

The period during which the employer may submit these facts may be extended by the director for good cause.

(c) The department shall consider these facts together with any information in its possession. If the employer is entitled to a ruling under subdivision (b) or to a determination under Section 1328, the department shall promptly notify the employer of its ruling as to the cause of the termination of the claimant’s employment. The employer may appeal from a ruling or reconsidered ruling to an administrative law judge within 30 days
 after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause, which includes, but is not limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director is an interested party to an appeal. The department may for good cause reconsider a ruling or reconsidered ruling within either five days after the date an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed or, if an appeal is not filed, within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling. However, a ruling or reconsidered ruling that relates to a determination that is reconsidered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1332 may also be reconsidered by the department within the time provided for reconsideration of that determination.

(d) For purposes of this section only, if the claimant voluntarily leaves the employer’s employ without notification to the employer of the reasons for the leaving, and if the employer submits all of the facts within its possession concerning the leaving within the applicable time period referred to in this section, the leaving is presumed to be without good cause.

(e) An individual whose employment is terminated under the compulsory retirement provisions of a collective bargaining agreement to which the
 employer is a party shall not be deemed to have voluntarily left their employment without good cause.

(f) For purposes of this section, “spouse” includes a person to whom marriage is imminent, and “domestic partner” includes a person to whom a domestic partnership, as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, is imminent.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 20.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.1.

(a) If the employment of an individual is terminated due to his absence from work for a period in excess of 24 hours because of his incarceration and he is convicted of the offense for which he was incarcerated or of any lesser included offense, he shall be deemed to have left his work voluntarily without good cause for the purposes of Sections 1030, 3701, and 4701. A plea or verdict of guilty irrespective of whether an order granting probation or other order is made suspending the imposition of the sentence or whether sentence is imposed but execution thereof is suspended, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, is deemed to be a
 conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any ruling made prior to a conviction or other final disposition of the criminal complaint or accusation by the court as to whether an individual who is terminated due to his absence from work because of incarceration voluntarily leaves without good cause may, if no appeal has been taken from the ruling, for good cause be reconsidered by the department during the benefit year or extended duration period or extended benefit period to which the ruling relates. Notice of any reconsidered ruling shall be given to the employer which received notice under Section 1030 or 3701 or 4701, and the employer may appeal therefrom in the manner prescribed in Section 1328 or 3655 or 4655.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 751.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.

No ruling made under Section 1030 may constitute a basis for the disqualification of any claimant but a determination by the department made under the provisions of Section 1328 may constitute a ruling under Section 1030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.

If it is ruled under Section 1030 or 1328 that the claimant left the employer’s employ voluntarily and without good cause, or left under one of the following circumstances, benefits paid to the claimant subsequent to the termination of employment that are based upon wages earned from the employer prior to the date of the termination of employment shall not be charged to the account of the employer, except as provided by Section
 1026 or if the department determines pursuant to Section 1026.1 that the employer’s reserve account should not be credited, unless the employer failed to furnish the information specified in Section 1030 within the time limit prescribed in that section or unless that ruling is reversed by a reconsidered ruling:

(a) The claimant was discharged by reason of misconduct connected with his or her work.

(b) The claimant was a student employed on a temporary basis and whose employment began within, and ended with his or her leaving to return to school at the close of, his or her vacation period.

(c) The claimant left the employer’s employ to accompany his or her spouse or domestic partner to a place or to join him or her at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment, and to which a transfer of the
 claimant by the employer is not available.

(d) The claimant left the employer’s employ to protect his or her family or himself or herself from domestic violence abuse.

(e) The claimant left the employer’s employ to take a substantially better job.

(f) The claimant’s discharge or quitting from his or her most recent employer was the result of an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants including alcoholic beverages.

(g) For purposes of this section “spouse” includes a person to whom marriage is imminent, and “domestic partner” includes a person to whom a domestic partnership, as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, is imminent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 5.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.5.

(a) Any base period employer may, within 15 days after mailing of a notice of computation under subdivision (a) of Section 1329, submit to the department facts within its possession disclosing that the individual claiming benefits is rendering services for that employer in less than full-time work, and that the individual has continuously, commencing in or prior to the beginning of the base period, rendered services for that employer in such less than full-time work.

(b) The department shall consider facts submitted under subdivision (a) of this section together with any information in its possession and promptly notify the employer of its ruling. If the department finds that an individual is, under Section 1252, unemployed in any week on the basis of the individual having less than full-time work, and that the employer submitting facts under this section is a base period employer for whom the individual has continuously, commencing in or prior to the beginning of the base period, rendered services in such less than full-time work, that employer’s account shall not be charged, except as provided by Section 1026 or if the department determines pursuant to Section 1026.1 that the employer’s reserve account should not be credited, for benefits paid the individual in any week in which such wages are payable by that employer to the individual. The employer may appeal from a ruling or reconsidered ruling to an administrative law judge within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause, which shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal. The department may for good cause reconsider any ruling or reconsidered ruling within either five days after an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed or, if no appeal is filed, within 30 days after service of the notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 21.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.

The director shall not less frequently than once each year furnish each employer with an itemized statement of the charges to the reserve account, and a statement of the reserve account showing the credits and charges, the net balance of the reserve account and the contribution rate for the applicable rating period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 446, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

(a) The employer, within 60 days after the date of mailing of any statement of charges or credits and charges to the reserve account, or within an additional period not exceeding 60 days which may for good cause be granted by the director, may file with the director a written protest on any item shown thereon. The protest shall set forth the specific grounds on which it is made. No protest may be made on the ground that a claimant was ineligible for a benefit payment where the employer was notified as required by this division and any
 authorized regulation of the filing of a claim for the benefits or of a determination of the claimant’s eligibility therefor and the employer failed to file a timely appeal on the benefit claim, or a final decision of an administrative law judge or of the appeals board affirmed the payment of the benefits. Except as to corrections made by the director as provided in Section 1036, the contribution rate and other items shown on any such statement of charges or statement of account shall be final unless a protest is filed within the time prescribed in this section.

(b) The employer, within 30 days after the last working day of March, may file a protest on the grounds that the director did not allow voluntary unemployment insurance contributions to the reserve account in accordance with Section 976.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 446, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.

The director shall give notice pursuant to Section 1206 to the employer of his or her action on a protest filed under Section 1034.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

(a) The director shall give notice, pursuant to Section 1206, to the employer of the correction of any error which the director finds in any statement of account or statement of charges. Except in the case where fraud, intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure is found, the notice of correction shall be issued prior to the expiration of the rating period to which a statement relates.

(b) Any additional amount of contributions resulting from an increased
 contribution rate caused by the correction of any error that the director finds in any statement of reserve account or statement of charges shall be assessed within 180 days from the postmarked date of the notice of correction. These assessments shall be issued in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126). However, these assessments shall become final on the last day of the calendar month following the calendar quarter in which the assessment is issued.

(c) Any overpaid amount of contributions resulting from a reduced rate caused by the correction of an error that the director finds on any statement of reserve account or statement of charges shall be refunded within 180 days of the postmarked date of the notice of correction. These refunds shall be issued in accordance with Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.

If a protest involving the contribution rate is pending when any contribution to which such rate relates is due, the employer shall pay the contribution at the rate shown in the statement furnished by the director. Such a protest, however, shall constitute a claim for refund under Article 9 of this chapter, and if a final determination on the protest reduces the contribution rate the amount of overpayment shall be promptly credited or refunded as provided in that article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transfer of Reserve Accounts [1051. - 1061.]

1051.

Whenever any employing unit acquires the organization, trade, or business, or substantially all of the assets thereof, or a distinct and severable portion of such organization, trade, or business, of any employer, excepting any assets retained by the employer incident to the liquidation of his obligations (whether or not the acquiring employing unit was an “employing unit” within the meaning of Section 135 prior to such acquisition), and continues such organization, trade, or business, or such distinct and severable portion thereof without substantial reduction of personnel resulting from such acquisition, an application may be made within 90 days of such acquisition for
 transfer of reserve account. The application shall contain the name and address of the predecessor, the date of acquisition, the name of the successor, the number of employees prior to and subsequent to the date of acquisition, and, in case of severable portions, such pay roll data as may be required by the department to determine the proper amount to be transferred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.5.

To the extent permitted by federal law, Sections 1051, 1052, and 1053 are applicable to acquisitions by a nonprofit organization which has elected reimbursement financing pursuant to Section 801 and the director shall transfer the reserve account of the predecessor employer to the successor nonprofit organization. Notwithstanding Section 1029, the reserve account shall not be canceled and the cost of benefits otherwise chargeable to the organization shall be charged to the reserve account until it is exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 855, Sec. 3.   Effective September 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

Upon receipt of the application the separate account, actual contribution and benefit experience and payrolls of the predecessor or that part thereof, as determined by authorized regulations, which pertains to the organization, trade, or business, or portion thereof acquired, shall be transferred to the successor employer for the purpose of determining its rate of contribution after the acquisition with the same effect for that purpose as if the operations of the predecessor had at all times been carried on by the successor. The separate account shall be
 transferred by the director to the successor employer and, as of the date of the acquisition, shall become the separate account or part of the separate account, as the case may be, of the successor employer, and the benefits thereafter chargeable to the predecessor employer on account of employment relating to the transferred organization, trade, or business or transferred portion thereof prior to the date of the acquisition shall be charged to the separate account. This section shall not apply to any acquisition which is determined by the director to have been made for the purpose of obtaining a more favorable rate of contributions under Section 977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

Sections 1051 and 1052 are applicable to applications for transfer of reserve accounts made after the 90-day period beginning with the date of acquisition but prior to the cancellation of the reserve account pursuant to Section 1029 if the reserve account has not been reacquired by the predecessor on re-entering business or, in the case of distinct and severable portions, if the predecessor did not continue in business, but any amendment of the contribution rate shall be made as of the first day of the calendar quarter next succeeding the date of the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

The provisions of this article requiring a specific application for transfer of reserve account shall not apply to any successor who through error or inadvertence continued to file contribution reports and pay contributions for the account and at the rate determined by the department to apply to the predecessor employer, but such reporting and payment shall be deemed to be in lieu of the application and shall be given the same effect as though a specific application had been filed during the 90-day period beginning with the date of acquisition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

In the event of a denial or granting of an application for transfer of reserve account, the director shall give notice pursuant to Section 1206 to the employing unit making such application, and to the predecessor employing unit to whose reserve account the application relates, if such predecessor employing unit has continued in business as an employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

The director may prescribe regulations for the establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts by two or more employers and shall, in accordance with such regulations, upon application by two or more employers to establish such account or to merge their several individual accounts in a joint account, maintain such joint account, as if it constituted a single employer’s account.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

Upon dissolution of a joint venture each participating employer may within 90 days apply for the transfer of his proportionate share of the reserve account. Upon receipt of the application the separate account, actual contribution and benefit experience and pay rolls of such joint venture shall be apportioned among the employers making such application in the same proportion that assets are distributed among the participating employers, and the portion thereof of each shall be transferred to each such employer for the purpose of determining its rate of contribution after the dissolution with the same effect for such purpose as if the applicable portion of the operations of
 such joint venture had at all times been carried on by such employer. Such portion of such separate account shall be transferred by the director to each such employer and as of the date of such dissolution shall become the separate account or part of the separate account, as the case may be, of such employer. The benefits thereafter chargeable to such joint venture on account of employment relating to such joint venture prior to the date of such dissolution shall be charged to the separate accounts of such employers in proportion to their participation in the joint venture. Any such joint venture shall promptly notify the director of its dissolution.

As used in this section only, “employer” includes the successor of an employer and any subsequent successor employer or employers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

As used in this article the term “joint venture” means a separate employing unit which has been organized by two or more employers to accomplish a contract or project or series of contracts or projects and which is wholly owned by such employers. As used in this section only, “employer” means any individual or type of organization, including any partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate, joint stock company, insurance company, corporation whether domestic or foreign, and the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof, and the legal representative of a deceased person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1060.

A change in contribution rate caused by a transfer under this article of all or a portion of the separate account, actual contribution and benefit experience and pay rolls shall not become effective earlier than the beginning of the calendar quarter next succeeding the effective date of the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

(a) For purposes of this article, the reserve account attributable to a transferred business shall also be transferred to, and combined with, the reserve account attributable to the employer to whom that business is transferred, if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) An employer transfers all or part of its business or payroll to another employer.

(2) At the time of transfer, both employers are under common
 ownership, management, or control.

(b) This section shall be applied to meet the minimum requirements contained in any guidance or regulations issued by the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Records, Reports and Contribution Payments [1085. - 1098.]

1085.

Every employing unit shall keep a true and accurate work record of:

(a) All his workers and their status, i.e., employed, on layoff or leave of absence.

(b) The wages paid by him to each worker.

(c) Such other information as the director deems necessary to proper administration of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 230.)
-------------------------------------------

1086.

(a) Each employing unit within 15 days after becoming an employer as defined in this part shall register with the department on a form prescribed by the department.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an Indian tribe (as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code) that employed one or more workers on or after December 21, 2000, and prior to the operative date of the statute adding this subdivision at the 2001 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature that has not registered with the department by the operative date of the statute, shall register with the department within 15 days of that operative date.

(2) The subject date for employers who register with the department under the provisions of paragraph (1) shall be December 21, 2000, or the date that employer first hired an employee, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 515.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1087.

Any officer or employee of the Sales and Use Tax Division of the Board of Equalization who is authorized to accept an application for a seller’s permit under Section 6066 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or authorized to register a retailer under Section 6226 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is a duly authorized agent of the Employment Development Department for purposes of accepting registration of employers as required in this part.

The department shall reimburse the Board of Equalization for any additional costs
 incurred by reason of services by any of its officers or employees to the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.

(a) (1) Each employer shall file with the director within the time required by subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 1110 for payment of employer contributions, a report of contributions, a quarterly return, and a report of wages paid to the employer’s workers in the form and containing any information as the director prescribes. An electronic funds transfer of contributions pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1110 shall satisfy the requirement for a report of contributions. The quarterly return shall include the total amount of wages, employer
 contributions required under Sections 976 and 976.6, worker contributions required under Section 984, the amounts required to be withheld under Section 13020, or withheld under Section 13028, and any other information as the director shall prescribe. The report of wages shall include individual amounts required to be withheld under Section 13020 or withheld under Section 13028.

(2) (A) In order to enhance efforts to reduce tax fraud and to reduce the personal income tax reporting burden, effective January 1, 1997, the report of wages shall also include the full first name of the employee and total wages, as defined in Section 13009, paid to each employee. This paragraph shall apply to reports of wages for all periods ending on or before December 31, 1999.

(B) For all periods beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the report of wages shall also include total wages subject to personal income tax, as defined in Section 13009.5, paid to each employee.

(b) Each employer shall file with the director within the time required by subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 1110 for payment of worker contributions, a report of contributions containing the employer’s business name, address, and account number, the total amount of worker contributions due, and any other information as the director shall prescribe. The director shall prescribe the form for the report of contributions. An electronic funds transfer of contributions pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1110 shall satisfy the requirement for a report of contributions.

(c) In
 addition to the report of contributions, quarterly return, and report of wages required by employers under subdivision (a), an individual who has elected coverage under subdivision (a) of Section 708 is also required to file a separate report of contributions, and quarterly return, subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601).

(d) Any employer making an election under subdivision (d) of Section 1110 shall submit the report of wages described in subdivision (a), within the time required for submitting employer contributions under subdivision (a) of Section 1110.

(e) For purposes of making a report of wages under subdivision (a), employers that are required under Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code and authorized regulations thereunder to file magnetic media
 returns, shall, within 90 days of becoming subject to this requirement, do one of the following:

(1) File any subsequent reports of wages electronically.

(2) Establish to the satisfaction of the director that there is a lack of automation, a severe economic hardship, a current exemption from submitting magnetic media or electronic information returns for federal purposes, or other good cause for not complying with this subdivision. Approved waivers shall be valid for one year or longer, at the discretion of the director.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall be allowed access to the information filed with the department pursuant to this section.

(g) The
 requirement in subdivision (a) to file a quarterly return shall begin with the first calendar quarter of the 2011 calendar year.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), effective January 1, 2017, an employer with 10 or more employees shall file the report of contributions, quarterly return, and report of wages electronically.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), effective January 1, 2018, all employers shall file the report of contributions, quarterly return, and report of wages electronically.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), an employer may request a waiver from the electronic filing requirements of this subdivision. The department may grant the waiver when the employer